DI-490
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DI1B9-10

DTC B0108/52 Short in P Squib Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and front passenger airbag assembly.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-2.

DTC B0108/52 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the P squib circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

« Short circuit in P squib wire harness (to B+) « Front passenger airbag assembly (P squib)
B0108/52 ¢ P squib malfunction « Airbag sensor assembly

« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction *Wire harness

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-480.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)

-

2 [ Check P squib circuit.

CHECK:
(@  Turn ignition switch to ON.
:l Airbag (b)  Forthe connector (on the front passenger airbag assem-

C[l a:[l :l Sensor bly side) between the front passenger airbag assembly
Assembl i -
P Squib :| y and the airbag sensor assembly, measure the voltage be

tween P+ and body ground.
OK:

ON Voltage: 0 V

@ | py

Ho1022 NG> Repair or replace harness or connector be-

e = oisne tween front passenger airbag assembly and air-
bag sensor assembly.

@
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
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PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©)

Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
Using a service wire, connect P+ and P- of the connector
(on the front passenger airbag assembly side) between
the front passenger airbag assembly and the airbag sen-
sor assembly.

Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See step 5 on page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO 108/52is notoutput.

CodesotherthancodeB0O 108/52 may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 [ Check P squib.

Check Connector

H01024
AB0118 ABO119
R13006 H01076

P Squib
a :l Airbag
Cm: Sensor
Assembly
ACC ON

ORG,

DTC B0108/52

HO1199

PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the front passenger airbag assembly connector.
Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO 108/52is notoutput.

CodesotherthancodeB0O 108/52 may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG > Replace front passenger airbag assembly.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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